Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 4. Permit Buy-Back Assessment.

Sec. 43.76.300.
Permit buy-back assessment.

A person holding a limited entry permit or interim-use permit under AS 16.43 for a fishery subject to a permit buy-back assessment established by the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission under AS

16.43.310

shall pay the permit buy-back assessment at the rate established by the commission on the value, as defined in AS

43.75.290

, of fish that the person removes from the state or transfers to a buyer in the state under the authority conferred by the limited entry permit or interim-use permit. The buyer shall collect the permit buy-back assessment at the time the fish is acquired by the buyer.

History.

(§ 9 ch 135 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

43.76.220

. Renumbered in 2002.

Sec. 43.76.310.
Collection of assessment.

Except as otherwise provided under (f) of this section, a buyer who acquires fish that are subject to a permit buy-back assessment imposed by AS

43.76.300

shall collect the permit buy-back assessment at the time of purchase and shall remit the total permit buy-back assessment collected during each month to the Department of Revenue by the last day of the next month.

A buyer who collects a permit buy-back assessment shall

maintain records of the value of fish purchased in the state that were subject to a permit buy-back assessment;

report the total value, as defined in AS

43.75.290

, of the fish acquired during the preceding year that were subject to a permit buy-back assessment to the department by March 1 of each year.

The owner of fish removed from the state is liable for payment of a permit buy-back assessment imposed by AS

43.76.300

if, at the time the fish is removed from the state, the assessment payable on the fish has not been collected by a buyer. If the owner of the fish is liable for payment of the permit buy-back assessment under this subsection, the owner shall comply with the requirements under (a) and (b) of this section to remit the assessment to the department, to maintain records, and to report to the department.

A permit buy-back assessment collected under this section shall be deposited in the state treasury. The department shall separately account for the amounts collected and interest accrued on the amounts collected for each permit buy-back assessment imposed under AS

43.76.300

. The legislature may appropriate revenue generated by a permit buy-back assessment and interest accrued on the assessment to the buy-back fund established for the fishery in which the assessment was collected for the purpose of supporting the buy-back program for that fishery under AS

16.43.310

and

16.43.320

.

The provisions of AS 43.05 and AS 43.10 apply to the enforcement and collection of a permit buy-back assessment levied under AS

43.76.300

—

43.76.320

.

A direct marketing fisheries business licensed under AS

43.75.020(c)

or a commercial fisherman who transfers possession of fish to a buyer who is not a fisheries business licensed under AS 43.75 is liable for the payment of a permit buy-back assessment imposed by AS

43.76.300

if, at the time possession of the fish is transferred to a buyer, the permit buy-back assessment payable on the fish has not been collected. If a direct marketing fisheries business or commercial fisherman is liable for payment of a permit buy-back assessment under this subsection, the direct marketing fisheries business or commercial fisherman shall comply with the requirements under (b) of this section to maintain records and report the value of fish acquired during the preceding year. Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a person subject to this subsection shall remit the total permit buy-back assessment payable during the calendar year to the Department of Revenue before April 1 after close of the calendar year.

History.

(§ 9 ch 135 SLA 2002; am §§ 14, 15 ch 147 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

43.76.230

. Renumbered in 2002, at which time “AS

43.76.300

” was substituted for “AS

43.76.220

” in subsections (a), (c), and (d), and “AS

43.76.300

—

43.76.320

” was substituted for “AS

43.76.220

—

43.76.240

” in subsection (e) to reflect the 2002 renumbering of AS 43.76.220 —

43.76.240

.

Sec. 43.76.320.
Definition.

In AS

43.76.300

—

43.76.320

, “buyer” means a person who acquires possession of fish from the person who caught the fish regardless of whether there is an actual sale of the fish, but does not include a person engaged solely in interstate transportation of goods for hire.

History.

(§ 9 ch 135 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

43.76.240

.
Renumbered in 2002, at which time “AS

43.76.300

—

43.76.320

” was substituted for “AS

43.76.220

—

43.76.240

” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of those sections.